Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska57-1622
Storage facility; cooperative operation.

Cooperative operation of a storage facility under a permit issued by the commission does not violate Nebraska statutes relating to trusts, monopolies, or restraint of trade.

Laws 2021, LB650, § 22.
August 28, 2021